Illinois, session 104th, HB4917.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Program of All-Inclusive Care for the 5Elderly Act is amended by adding Section 18 as follows: 6    (320 ILCS 40/18 new)7    Sec. 18. Rate-setting, revenue maximization, and 8participant flexibility.9    (a) Revenue maximization and resource alignment. The 10Department shall coordinate with the Department on Aging and 11the Department of Human Services to ensure the maximization of 12all available federal financial participation and existing 13State revenue sources. This shall include, but not be limited 14to:15        (1) Identifying and integrating funding streams 16    currently used for the Home and Community-Based Services 17    (HCBS) waivers to support PACE enrollment.18        (2) Developing a unified budgeting approach under 19    which appropriations for long-term services and supports 20    are treated as a fungible pool, allowing funding to 21    transition seamlessly when a participant chooses PACE over 22    traditional waiver services.23    (b) Funding portability. To ensure participant choice and   HB4917- 2 -LRB104 18150 RPS 31589 b1program flexibility, the Department shall establish a 2service-neutral enrollment mechanism.3        (1) Preservation of eligibility. An individual found 4    eligible for a nursing facility level of care for the 5    purpose of a HCBS waiver shall be deemed clinically 6    eligible for the PACE program without a requirement for a 7    separate or additional medical assessment.8        (2) Immediate fund transfer. Upon a participant's 9    voluntary election to enroll in a PACE program, the 10    Department shall facilitate the immediate transition of 11    the actuarially equivalent waiver dollar to the PACE 12    organization's capitated payment.13        (3) Waitlist continuity. If an individual is on a 14    waiting list for a HCBS waiver and chooses to enroll in 15    PACE, the individual's status and slot value shall be 16    preserved and applied to the PACE capitation rate to 17    ensure the State's budget neutrality.18    (c) Participant flexibility and reentry. To prevent an 19inability to access resident-centered and resident-chosen 20services, the Department shall ensure that:21        (1) Participants may transition between PACE and 22    traditional HCBS models during any open enrollment period 23    or upon a change in medical necessity so long as the 24    transition does not result in a gap in care or loss of 25    Medicaid eligibility.26        (2) The Department shall use a Unified Assessment Tool   HB4917- 3 -LRB104 18150 RPS 31589 b1    to ensure that the participant's clinical profile is 2    portable between the managed care organization-waiver 3    system and the PACE delivery model.